Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1060
Body art; license required; conditions.

(1) No person shall perform any of the practices of body art or display a sign to, or in any other way, advertise or purport to be engaged in the business of practicing body art unless such person is licensed by the department.

(2) An applicant for licensure in any of the practices of body art shall show to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant:

(a) Has complied with the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act and the applicable rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(b) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(c) Has completed formal education equivalent to a United States high school education;

(d) Has submitted evidence of training or experience prescribed or approved by the board to ensure the protection of the public in performing the practices of body art for which the applicant is seeking licensure; and

(e) Has successfully completed an examination prescribed or approved by the board to test the applicant's knowledge of safety, sanitation, and sterilization techniques and infection control practices and requirements.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 25;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-385.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 322.